Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202671-7910
Peer review committee, defined; policies and procedures.

(1) Peer review committee means a utilization review committee, quality assessment committee, performance improvement committee, tissue committee, credentialing committee, or other committee established by a professional health care service entity or by the governing board of a facility which is a health care provider that does either of the following:

(a) Conducts professional credentialing or quality review activities involving the competence of, professional conduct of, or quality of care provided by a health care provider, including both an individual who provides health care and an entity that provides health care; or

(b) Conducts any other attendant hearing process initiated as a result of a peer review committee's recommendations or actions.

(2) To conduct peer review pursuant to the Health Care Quality Improvement Act, a professional health care service entity shall adopt and adhere to written policies and procedures governing the peer review committee of the professional health care service entity.

Laws 2011, LB431, § 7;

Laws 2019, LB119, § 5.